Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.04.545

Washington award for vocational excellence—Fee waivers—Grants.

(1) The respective governing boards of the public technical colleges shall provide fee waivers for a maximum of two years for those recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence established under RCW 28C.04.520 through 28C.04.540 who received the award before June 30, 1994. To qualify for the waiver, recipients shall enter the public technical college within three years of receiving the award. An above average rating at the technical college in the first year shall be required to qualify for the second-year waiver.

(2) Students named by the workforce training and education coordinating board after June 30, 1994, as recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence under RCW 28C.04.520 through 28C.04.550 shall be eligible to receive a grant for undergraduate coursework as authorized under RCW 28B.76.670.

(3)(a) Beginning with awards made during the 1998-99 academic year, recipients must complete using the award before the fall term in the sixth year following the date of the award. For these recipients, eligibility for the award is forfeited after this period.

(b) All persons awarded a Washington award for vocational excellence before the 1995-96 academic year and who have remaining eligibility on April 19, 1999, must complete using the award before September 2002. For these recipients, eligibility for the award is forfeited after this period.

(c) All persons awarded a Washington award for vocational excellence during the 1995-96, 1996-97, and 1997-98 academic years must complete using the award before September 2005. For these recipients, eligibility for the award is forfeited after this period.

[ 2004 c 275 s 61; 1999 c 28 s 1; 1995 1st sp.s. c 7 s 6; 1987 c 231 s 4; 1984 c 267 s 7.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Effective date—1999 c 28: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 19, 1999]." [ 1999 c 28 s 2.]

Severability—1995 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 28C.04.520.